src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Documenting the file for  *Meänkieli adjective morphology*

This file documents  the file *affixes/adjectives.lexc* for Meänkieli adjective morphology.

Most lexica here (*a1, a_e, ...*) add **+A**, and thereafter redirect to the 
corresponding **x1, x_e, ...** lexicon in `affixes/nouns.lexc` for case inflection.
The lexicon numbers correspond to the ones for nouns.

In addition, each lexicon also points to comparative and superlative sublexica.

* a1: pointing to x1, even syllable adjectives; kova, iso
* a1_ta: as a1 plus plural partitive -ta: paksuita

## Unassigned

**LEXICON ax** pointing to **a1**. It is for adjectives that have still not been classified.

## Regular lexica

**LEXICON a1** adding **+A** and sending to **x1**, and to *3comp, 3sup*.
* +A+Comp:%^AE 3comp ; 
* +A+Superl: 3sup ;

**LEXICON a1_ta** vanhaa !TODO!

**LEXICON a1_aa** vanhaa !TODO!

**LEXICON a1_kova** Like a1 but: 

**LEXICON a1_e** vanha, which has Err/Orth vanhee-, otherwise like a1

**LEXICON a1_hyva** for hyvä

**LEXICON a1_pitka** for pitkä:pit

**LEXICON a_vasen** adding **+A** and sending to **x1**, and to *3comp, 3sup*.

**LEXICON a_e** gets +A and goes to x_e.
* +A: x_e ;
* +A+Comp: 4comp ;
* +A+Superl:ime 4sup;

**LEXICON a3** kamala gets +A and points to x3
* +A: x3_sg ;

**LEXICON a4** has no comparative or superlative , just points to x4
* +A: x4 ;

**LEXICON anen** for even-stem-nen-adjectives, points to xnen  
* +A: xnen ; #TODO: komparera!

**LEXICON anen_odd** for odd-stem -nen-adjectives like näkönen:näköse-, points to x3nen
* +A: x3nen ; #TODO: komparera!

**LEXICON aas**  has no comparative or superlative , just points to xnas

**LEXICON a_s** new subgroup for hias:hita etc !TBC!

**LEXICON a_suuri** has no comparative or superlative , just points to x4
* +A:e x5_sg ;

**LEXICON a1_ton** 
* +A: x1_ton ;

**LEXICON x1_ton** 
* +Sg+Nom:%>^On K ;
* +Sg+Gen:t%>^Om^An K ;
* +Sg+Par:%>^Ont^A K ;
* +Sg+Ill:t%>h^Om^A^An K ;
* +Sg+Ine:t%>^Om^Ass^A K ; etc.

* +Comp:t%>^Om 3comp ; 
* +Superl: 3sup ;

## Comparative inflection

**LEXICON 3comp**  2syll adj, 3syll comparative

**LEXICON 4comp**   3syll adj, 4syll comparative
* +Sg+Ess:%>mp^An^A K ;
* +Sg+All:%>m^Ale K ; etc.

**LEXICON xcomp**   common for 2syll and 3syll
* +Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi # ;
* +Sg+Gen:%>m^A%>n K ; etc.

### Superlative inflection

**LEXICON 3sup**   2syll adj, 3syll superlative
* +Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^Ann^A K ;
* +Sg+All:%>i5m^Alle K ; etc.

**LEXICON 4sup**  3syll adj, 4syll superlative
* +Sg+Ess:%>i5mp^An^A K ;
* +Sg+All:%>i5m^Ale K ; etc.

**LEXICON xsup**   common for 2syll and 3syll

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc)</small>
